Wyoming, session 2026, HB0058.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-9-201(b), 21-20-109(a) and
21-20-110(b) and (h) are amended to read:

HB0058

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0023
18-9-201. Recreational facilities and systems of
public recreation; authority to establish and maintain;
joint action by political subdivision; tax levies; removal.

(b) The board of county commissioners may levy and
expend funds for recreational purposes. Any levy imposed by
a school district for recreational facilities and systems
of public recreation shall not exceed one (1) mill on the
assessed valuation of a school district. A levy for
recreational facilities and systems of public recreation
imposed by a school district is in addition to the tax
limitations stated in W.S. 21-13-102. No tax shall be
levied under this subsection until a proposition to impose
the levy is submitted to a vote of the qualified electors
of the county or school district and a majority of all
votes cast within the county or school district vote in
favor of imposing the additional tax levy. The proposition
to impose the additional tax levy shall be submitted at an
election held on the same date of the general election. The
board of county commissioners shall publish notice of the
election in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or school district and the election shall be
conducted in accordance with the procedures provided by
HB0058

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0023
W.S. 22-22-301 through 22-22-304. The term of the tax levy
shall be four (4) years and the term of the tax levy shall
be stated in the proposition submitted to the voters. If a
proposition establishing the tax levy is approved, to
continue the tax levy the proposition shall be submitted at
the second general election following the election at which
the proposition was initially approved and at the general
election held every four (4) years thereafter until the
proposition is defeated.

21-20-109. Special school district tax for board of
cooperative educational services; election not required;
determination of levy amount.

(a) For the purpose of maintaining programs offered
by a board of cooperative educational services, the school
districts comprising the board may levy a special school
district tax not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the
assessed value of the member districts. The vote of the
electors within the member districts shall not be required
for the tax levy No tax shall be levied under this section
until a proposition to impose the levy is submitted to a
vote of the qualified electors of the member school
HB0058

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0023
districts comprising the board and a majority of all votes
cast within the member districts vote in favor of imposing
the additional tax levy. The proposition to impose the
additional tax levy shall be submitted at an election held
on the same date of the general election. The board shall
publish notice of the election within a newspaper of
general circulation in the affected districts and the
election shall be conducted in accordance with the
procedures provided by W.S. 22-22-301 through 22-22-304.
The term of the tax levy shall be four (4) years and the
term of the tax levy shall be stated in the proposition
submitted to the voters. If a proposition establishing the
tax levy is approved, to continue the tax levy the
proposition shall be submitted at the second general
election following the election at which the proposition
was initially approved and at the general election held
every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is
defeated. Each member school district shall be responsible
for the costs incident to the election and shall pay an
equally proportioned share of the costs as determined by
the county clerk.

HB0058

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0023
21-20-110. Additional special school district tax;
election; limitations; special community college district
levy.

(b) Except as provided by subsection (h) of this
section, No additional tax shall be levied under this
section until a proposition to impose the levy is submitted
to a vote of the qualified electors of the member school
districts comprising the board and a majority of all votes
cast within the member districts vote in favor of imposing
the additional tax levy. The proposition to impose the
additional levy shall be submitted at an election held on a
the same date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103 of the
general election. The board shall publish notice of the
election within a newspaper of general circulation in the
affected districts and the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the procedures provided by W.S. 22-22-301
through 22-22-304. The term of the tax shall be four (4)
years and the term of the tax shall be stated in the
proposition submitted to the voters. If a proposition
establishing the tax is approved, to continue the tax the
proposition shall be submitted at the second general
election following the election at which the proposition
HB0058

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0023
was initially approved and at the general election held
every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is
defeated. Each member school district shall pay all be
responsible for the costs incident to the election within
its district or if a concurrent election, and shall pay an
equally proportioned share of the costs as determined by
the county clerk.

(h) In addition to subsection (a) of this section,
the board of trustees of any community college district
participating in an agreement under W.S. 21-20-104 may levy
a special levy of not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the
assessed value of the district. for a period not to exceed
two (2) years. Any levy imposed under this subsection shall
be used solely for purposes of maintaining programs offered
by the board of cooperative educational services of which
the district is a participant and when combined with any
levy imposed under subsection (a) of this section, shall
not exceed two (2) mills. A determination by the board to
impose the levy shall be made at a regular or special
meeting following a public hearing announced by the board.
Any No tax shall be imposed under this subsection may be
renewed by the board for an additional two (2) years
HB0058

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0023
subject to public hearing requirements specified under this
subsection until a proposition to levy the tax is submitted
to the electors in the manner provided in subsection (b) of
this section. Revenues collected under this subsection
shall be identified as district revenue in the biennial
funding report of the district under W.S. 21-18-205(b) but
shall not be restricted by the commission in any manner.

Section 2. Any tax levy imposed under W.S.
18-9-201(b), 21-20-109(a) or 21-20-110(h) prior to the
effective date of this act shall expire on December 31,
2028 or on the date that a proposition to impose a levy is
submitted to the electors as required by this act,
whichever occurs first. If the tax levy is approved by the
electors, the levy shall continue as provided by law.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0058